Washington statutes.
RCW 11.02.900

Short title—Washington trust act of 1984.

Chapter 149, Laws of 1984, as amended and reenacted in chapters 8, 9, 10, 11, 23, 30, and 31, Laws of 1985 shall be known as the Washington trust act of 1984.

[ 1985 c 30 s 2.]